Nebraska statutes.
Revised Statutes Cumulative Supplement, 202677-6847
Changes to sections; when effective; applicability.

The changes made in sections 77-6815 and 77-6831 by Laws 2026, LB1165, apply to all applications filed on and after April 17, 2026. For all applications filed prior to such date, the provisions of such sections as they existed immediately prior to such date apply. The changes made in section 77-6832 by Laws 2026, LB1165, apply to all applications filed before, on, or after April 17, 2026.

Laws 2026, LB1165, § 22.
April 17, 2026